en: Şalgam suyu, Turnip juices, Shalgam juices
xx: Şalgam suyu, Şalgam, Salgam suyu, Salgam
az: Şalğam suyu
ja: シャルガム
mk: Шалгам
ru: Шалгам
sr: Шалгам
uk: Шалгам

en: Yogurts with cereals
de: Joghurt mit Müsli
es: Yogures con cereales
fi: Viljajogurtit
fr: Yaourts aux céréales
hr: Jogurti sa žitaricama
nl: Yoghurt met granen
pt: Iogurtes com cereais
ro: Iaurturi cu cereale

en: Fat-free fermented yogurt with cereals, Fat-free fermented milk dairy specialty with cereals
fr: Yaourt au lait fermenté aux céréales à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aux céréales à 0% de matières grasses
hr: Fermentirani jogurt bez masti sa žitaricama
pt: Iogurtes sem gordura fermentados com cereais

en: Fermented milk yogurt with cereals, Dairy specialty with cereals
fr: Yaourt au lait fermenté aux céréales, Spécialité laitière aux céréales

en: Fish terrines, Fish terrine
de: Fisch-Terrinen, Fischterrinen
fi: kalaterriinit
fr: Terrines de poisson
hr: Riblje terine
it: Terrine di pesce
nl: Visterrines

en: Salmon terrines
de: Lachssuppen, Fischsuppen mit Lachs
fi: lohiterriinit
fr: Terrines de saumon
hr: Terine od lososa
nl: Zalmterrines, Zalmterrine, Zalmvleespotten

en: Trout terrines
fr: Terrines de truite
hr: Terine za pastrve
nl: Forelterinnes, Forelterrine

en: Specific products
fr: Produits spécifiques
nl: Specifieke producten
zh: 特定产品

en: Edible tableware
de: Essbares Geschirr
fr: Couverts comestibles, Vaisselles comestibles
hr: Jestivo posuđe

en: Dishes that may contain horse meat
de: Gerichte die Pferdefleisch beinhalten könnten
fr: Plats susceptibles de contenir de la viande de cheval
hr: Jela koja mogu sadržavati konjsko meso
nl: Gerechten die paardenvlees kunnen bevatten

en: Batches withdrawn from retail stores
de: Aus dem Handel genommene Posten
fr: Lots retirés de la vente
hr: Serije povučene iz maloprodaje
nl: Uit de handel genomen

en: Batches withdrawn from retail stores in february 2013
de: Posten die im Februar 2013 aus dem Handel genommen wurden
fr: lots retirés de la vente en février 2013
hr: Serije povučene iz maloprodaje u veljači 2013
nl: Uit de handel genomen voor februari 2013

en: Products for specific diets
fr: Produits pour régimes spécifiques
nl: Producten voor specifieke diëten

en: Products with reduced salt
de: Prudukte mit weniger Salz
es: Productos con sal reducida
fi: Tuotteet joissa vähennetty suolaa
fr: Produits à teneur réduite en sel
hr: Proizvodi sa smanjenim udjelom soli
it: Prodotti a basso contenuto di sale
nl: Producten met minder zout

en: Beware multiple products
fr: Attention produits multiples
hr: Pazite na više proizvoda
nl: Let op, meerdere producten

en: Products that cannot be found in metropolitan France
fr: produits introuvables en Métropole (pour la France)
hr: Proizvodi koji se ne mogu naći u metropolitanskoj Francuskoj
nl: Producten die niet in Frankrijk gevonden kunnen worden

en: Licensed products
de: Lizensierte Produkte
fi: Lisensoidut tuotteet
fr: Produits sous license
hr: Licencirani proizvodi
nl: Gelicenseerde producten
pt: Produtos licenciados

en: Special series
fr: série spéciale
hr: Posebne serije
nl: Speciale serie

en: Frozen raw shortcrust pastry with pure butter
fr: Pâte brisée pur beurre surgelée crue

en: Raw puff pastry with pure butter
fr: Pâte feuilletée pur beurre crue